Maryland, session 2025, HB0674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–405.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT, WITH THE INTENT TO CONCEAL THE DEATH OF
ANOTHER:
(1) FAIL TO CONTACT EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT REGARDING THE DEATH OF THE PERSON;
(2) A CRIME, KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY DISMEMBER, DESTROY,
REMOVE, BURY, DISPOSE OF, OR OTHERWISE OBLITERATE BY ANY MEANS ANY
PORTION OF HUMAN REMAINS; OR
(3) BURY OR OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF A DEAD BODY.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT AID OR ABET ANOTHER IN COMMITTING A
VIOLATION VIOLATING SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
– 1 –

Ch. 545 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 5 YEARS.
(D) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL MAY BE
CONSECUTIVE TO AND NOT OR CONCURRENT WITH ANY OTHER SENTENCE IMPOSED
FOR ANY OTHER CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –